tables/liblouis/tables/hyphenation/_hyphenation_hu.dic
me2nny1orsz
méreg1d2r
meré2sz3ség
mérté2k1ad
mérté2k1egység
mér2v1ad
.mé2sz1ég
.mé2sz1i
.mé2sz1o
méte2r1ár
mé2z3sör
.mé2z3sz
mikro1k2lima
.min2d1a
.min2d1ed
.min2d1egy
.min2d1ek
minde2n1ár
mindene2k1el
minde2n1eset
minde2n1ünnen
minde2n1ütt          %??
minde2n1üvé          %??
.min2d1ez
.min2d1in
.min2d1ö
.min2d1u
mine2k1ut
miniszte2r1elnök
min2t1egy
motoros3szem
munka1p2r
munká2s1á
munká2s1a
munkás1b2r
munká2s1e
munká2s1i
munká2s1oszt
munká2s1ott
munká2s1®
munká2s3sz
munka1s2t
munká2s1ú
munká2s1ü
munká2s3zubb
m¶1s2topp
m¶1t2rá
nádo2r1isp
.na2gy1a
.na2gy1á
.na2gy1e
.na2gy1ip
.na2gy1ü
na2p1áll
.na2p1e
.na2p1é2j1 % napéjegyenl
.na2p1év
.na2p1ó
naran2cs1íz
naran2cs3s
ná2sz1ágy
ná2sz1aj
ná2sz1assz
ná2sz1éj
ná2sz1ind
ná2sz1út
ná2sz1ut
nége2r1üld
.né2gy1
negye2d1
negye3d2et
negye3d2ek
negye3d2el
negye3d2en
negye3d2em
negye3d2ed
negye3d2e.
negye3d2éb % negyedében, negyedébõl
né3gy2es
né3gy2en
negyve2n3
negyve3n4et
negyve3n4em
negyve3n4ed
negyve3n4e.
nehé2z1ip
nehé2z3ség
nehé2z3súly
.ne2m1igen
néme2t1alfö
néme2t1ország
néme2t1ell
neo1k2lassz
.né2p1a
.né2p1á
.né2p1el
.né2p1eposz
.né2p1ének
.né2p1irt
.né2p1isk
.né2p1ítél
.né2p1okt
.né2p1osz
.né2p1u
.né2v1a
né2v1el®
né2v1utó
néze2t1elt
növé2ny1a
növé2ny1á
növé2ny1ev
növé2ny1ir
növé2ny1o
nya2k1örv
nyá2r1el®
nyá2r1utó
.nyel2v1á
.nyel2v1a
nyel2v1eml
nyel2v1érz
.nyel2v1is
.nyel2v1o
.nyel2v1ó
.nyel2v1ú
nyere2g3gyá
nyer2s1acél
nyer2s1any
nyer2s1olaj
.nyí2r1egy % Nyír-egy-háza
n4ylon
nyol2c1
nyol3c2a
nyolc3szor
nyolc3szög
nyolcva2n1
nyolcva3n2a
nyomá2s1áll
nyomdász3ság
nyomo2r1eny
.nyu2g1á
nyugdí2j1int
nyu2g1ellát
nyúl2t1agy
odáb2b1áll
odéb2b1áll
o2k1irat
oktatá2s1ügy
ola2j1ág
ola2j1ég
ola2j1ip
ola2sz1ország
olda2l1ág
olda2l1aj
olda2l1út
ólo2m1önt
ólo2m1üv
oro2sz1elle
oro2sz1ország
or2r1üreg
orszá2g1al
orszá2g1ár
orszá2g1ép
orszá2g1érd
ország3gy¶l
orszá2g1út
orvos3sz
osto2r1ant
ostro2m1állap
osztá2ly1áll
osztá2ly1ár
osztá2ly1e
osztá2ly1érd
osztá2ly1értek
osztá2ly1i
osztá2ly1ö
osztá2ly1u
ökö2r1ist
.ö2n1ál
.ö2n1ám
ön1elég
ön1elem
ön1élet
önéle2t1ír
.ön1el
.ön1érd
.ön1er®
.ö2n1érz
.ön1imád
.ön1ind
.ön1ism
.ön1ur
.®r1áll
.®r1angy
öre2g1any
öre2g1apa
öre2g1assz
öre2g1ember
öre2g1úr
örö2k1érv
örö2k1ifj
.örö2m1a
örö2m1érz
örö2m1est
örö2m1itt
örö2m1ujj
.®s1áll
.®s1a
®s1egyh
®s1emb
®s1er
®s1id®
®sz1el®
.össz1a
.össz1á
össze1p2r
össze1s2p
össz3súly
®sz1utó
.öt1
öt2en
öt2öd
öt2ös
öt2öt
öt2ök
öt2ön
ötve2n1
ötve3n2ed
ötve3n2et
ötve3n2ek
ötve3n2en
ötve3n2es
ötve3n2e.
ötve3n2em
®z1agancs
özve2gy1a
özve2gy1emb
padlá2s1abl
padlá2s3szoba
pamu2t1ipar
pá2n1amer
páncé2l1aut
páncé2l1ing
páncé2l1ö
papí2r1ár
papí2r1ip
papí2r1íz
paran2cs1ad
paran2cs1®r
paran2cs1ural
parasz2t1assz
parasz2t1emb
páro2s1ujj
pár2t1akt
pár2t1áll
.pár2t1e
.pár2t1éle
.pár2t1érde
pár2t1értek
pár2t1ig
pár2t1ir
pár2t1isko
pár2t1okt
pár2t1uta
.pár2t1ü
pászto2r1élet
pászto2r1óra
patká2ny1irt
pecsé2t1®r
pé2k1üzlet
.pén2z1a
.pén2z1á
pén2z1egys
pén2z1éhes
pén2z1embe
pén2z1érték
pénz2es3zsák
pén2z1int
pén2z1össz
.pénz3s
pén2z1ügy
pénzü2gy1igaz
pénzü2gy1®r
pe2r1érté
pe2r1orvos
.pe2r1új
pes2t1ú
p2lagiz
1p2lasztik
1p2letyk
1p2lomba
polgá2r1®r
pon2t1ered
.pó2t1a
.pó2t1ágy
.pó2t1ül
1p2rakti
1p2reciz
1p2recíz
1p2rédál
1p4rédikál
1p4rémez
1p4reparál
1p2résel
1p4resszio
p4rezent
1p4róba
1p4róbál
1p4roblém
1p4rodukál
1p4rofitál
1p2ro1g2ram
1p4roklamál
1p2roletá2r1áll
1p2roletá2r1oszt
1p4rolong
1p4ropagál
1p4roponál
1p4rostit
1p4rotezsál
1p4rovokál
1p4rüszköl
raj2z1eszk
raj3z1aszt
raj2z3sz
rá2k1okoz
rá2k1oll
raktá2r1állo
ran2g1id®s
ran2g1els®
reá2l1isko
refor2m1
refor3m2á
%refor4m3áll
refor3m2i
regé2ny1ir
regé2ny1ír
régiség3gyüjt
ré2g1óta
rejte2k1ajtó
rejte2k1út
reke2sz1izom
reklá2m1
reklá3m2oz
rekor2d1id®
ren2d1®r
rend®2r1áll
rend®2r1aut
rend®2r1®r
.re1p2ro
ré2sz1ará
ré2sz1össz
rete2sz1áll
ré2z1edé
ré2z1üst
rezgé2s3szám
ré2z3szín
ri2zs3szem
roham1b2rig
roha2m1oszt
roko2n1érte
romá2n1ellen
ro2m1eltak
ro2ssz1indulat
rova2r1ev®
rova2r1irt
rová2s1írás
ro2zs3szem
rö2p1irat
rövi2d1ár
sak2k1állás
sak2k1óra
sán2c1á
sán2c1épí
sanzo2n1ének
sárgá2s3zöld
sar2k1öv
sar2k1uta
saro2k1abl
saro2k1ül
sa2s1orr
.sa2s3sze
sa2s3szeg
.sa2v1áll
1s2ch		% to do a favour the German % but: Häs-chen
segé2d1a
segé2d1er®
segé2d1esz
segé2d1ige
segé2d1orv
segé2ly1a
segé2ly1á
segé2ly1egy
serté2s1o
serté2s1ó
serté2s3zsír
sike2r1emb
sike2r1él
sí2k1idom
sí2n1aut
sí2r1ásó
sí2r1eml
sí2r1irat
sisa2k1ellen
s2kalp
s2kandál
s2kicc
.sk2r
s2lukk
s2makkol
s2mirgli
sógo2r1aszz
so2k1értel
so2k1évi
so2k1ist
so2k1oldal
sonká2s3zsem
so2r1áll
so2r1emel
sor2s1üld
sö2r1ivó
sörö2s1üveg
spanyo2l1ország
s2pecial
s2peciál
s2pékel
s4pekulál
s2picc
s2picl
s2pórol
spor2t1ág
spor2t1e
spor2t1élet
spor2t1orv
spor2t1öltö
spor2t1®rül
spor2t1ünn
.sp2r
s2rófol
s4tagnál
s4tatisztál
s4terilizál
stílu2s1érz
stílu2s1irány
s4tíröl
s4toppol
1st2rukt %úra
.st2 %r
st2rand
st2rapál
st2rázsál
st4réber
sugá2r1árt
sugá2r1ir
sú2ly1egys
sú2ly1emel
2s1ügy
své2d1ország
szaba2d1egye
szaba2d1el®ad
szaba2d1elv
szá2j1üreg
sza2k1avat
sza2k1ember
sza2k1érettség
sza2k1értel
sza2k1ért®
sza2k1író
sza2k1iroda
sza2k1isk
sza2k1ismer
sza2k1oktatás
sza2k1orvos
sza2k1osztály
sza2k1üzlet
szállá2s1ad
szá2m1adás
szá2m1ad
szá2m1arány
szá2m1elmélet
szá2m1oszl
szá2m1¶z
száraz3ság
szár2ny1épül
szarva2s1aga
százalé2k1ará
szá2z1öt
szá2z1egy
szá2z1éves
szá2z1ezer
szá2z1ezr
száz3szá
száz3szo
szégye2n1érz
széjje2l1
szeké2r1út
széke2s1egyh
szé2l1árny
.szé2l1ir
.szé2l1üt
szembe2n1áll
sze2m1ellen
.szemé2ly1a
sze2m1üveg
széná2s3szekér
szé2n1éget
szé2n1ellát
szen2t1atya
szen2t1egyh
szen2t1este
szennye2s3zsák
szenny1ir
.szé2p1a
szé2p1érzék
szé2p1ír
szé2p1ir
szé2p1p2róza
szer2v1átül
3szer¶.
szere2p1oszt
szerete2t1ado
szerszá2m1acél
szerz®dé2s3sz
sze2sz1adó
sze2sz1éget
sze2sz1éleszt
sze2sz1ipar
.szé2t1
.sz2f
1sz2fér
szige2t1orsz
szikratá2v1ír
.szí2n1á
szí2n1arany
szí2n1érz
szí2n1ezüst
szí2n1igaz
szí2n3nyom
szí2n1s2kála
szin2t1akk
szin2t1anny
szin2t1oly
szin2t1úgy
3szín¶.
szí2v1alak
szí2v1átül
szí2v1izom
szólá2s3szabad
szomszé2d1assz
szovje2t1állam
szovje2t1ellen
szovje2t1orosz
sz®rö2s3szív¶
szöve2g1elem
szöve2g1ír
.sz2t
.szt2r
sztráj2k1®r
szü2n1id
sz¶2z1anya
takarmá2ny1árpa
tal2p1alatnyi
tal2p1aláv
taná2cs1ad
taná2cs1e
taná2cs1ü
tán2c3csop
tán2c1egy
tán2c1est
tán2c1ó
ta2n1év
ta2n1int
tanon2c1id
tanon2c1isk
tanon2c1ott
ta2n1óra
ta2n1ügy
tányé2r1akna
tá2p1anyag
tapasztala2t1átad
tá2p1érték
tár2gy1isme
társadalo2m1áb
társadalo2m1ell
tár2s3szerz % ??
tartalé2k1alap
tartalé2k1áll
tava2ly1el®tt
tá2v1ir
tá2v1ír
távira2t1s2tílus
távo2l1ugr
tá2v1úsz
tegna2p1el®tt
tehé2n1ist
tehe2r1ár
tehe2r1aut
te2j1ár
tejfele2s3száj % ??
tejfölö2s3száj % ??
te2j1ip
te2j1út
.te2j1ü
tekinté2ly1uralom
telefo2n1áll
telefo2n1auto
telefo2n1érme
tenge2r1áram
tenge2r1öböl
teni2sz1üt
té2ny1áll
tenyé2sz1áll
tenyé2sz1id®
tere2m1®r
tere2p1ism
tere2p1akad
té2r1érz
té2r1isz
termé2ny1ár
termé2s1ered
természe2t1átala
természe2t1ell
természe2t1im
ter2v1el®ir
ter2v1oszt
tes2t1alk
tes2t1ápol
tes2t1edz
tes2t1®r
tet2t1er®
texti2l1any
texti2l1ár
texti2l1ipar
1thyá1ny1
tífu2sz1olt
típu2s1áru
típu2s1ebéd
tisztele2t1ad
tisztessé2g1érz
tisz2t1új
tize2n1
.tí2z1
.tí3z2en
.tí3z2es
tí2z3szer
toalet2t1aszt
toro2ny1óra
toro2ny1ugr
2t1ország % Horvát, Német
tor2z3szül
továb2b1ad
továb2b1áll
töb2b1év
töb2b1ezer
töb2b1oldal
t®ké2s1áll
t®ké2s1oszt
töl2gy1erd
töme2g1er®
töme2g3gy
törö2k1ország
törö2k1ül
történe2t1ír
törvé2ny1alk
törvé2ny1ell
törvé2ny1er
tör2zs1®rm
tör2zs3szám
t2raccsol
t2rágya
t2rágyáz
t2rakto2r1állo
t2rancsír
t2ranszform
.tran2z1
t2rappol
t2récsel
t4réfál
t2rombit
.t2rón
t2ró2n1örök
t2ró2n1ut
tudá2s3szomj
tuda2t1alatt
tudomá2ny1egy
tú2l1ad
tú2l1árad
tú2l1él
tú2l1ér
tú2l1er®
tú2l1expo
tú2l1old
tú2l1ór
t¶2z1áll
tüzé2r1ezr
t¶2z1olt
t¶2z1®r
.t¶2z3sz
tyú2k1ól
.ugya2n1
úgy1annyi
úgy1is
újon2c1állít
ujsá2g1ár
újsá2g1ír
úr1assz
utá2n3nyom
utas3száll
utász3száz
út1elág
út1épít
út1irány
ügyész3ség
üg2y1int
üg2y1ir
üg2y1oszt
.ük1a
.ük1u
ülés3szak
.¶r1állom
üve2g1a
üve2g1á
üve2g1ed
üve2g3gy
üve2g1ipa
üze2m1anyag
üzle2t1emb
üzle2t1év
va2d1áll
va2d1alm
vadá2sz1e
vadász3zs
va2d1emb
va2d1evez
va2d1ideg
vá2d1irat
vadona2t1
va2d1®r
vá2gy1álom
va2gy1is
vagyo2n1ad
vagyo2n1átr
vagyo2n1ügy
va2k1ír
vallá2s1alap
vallá2s1ell
vallá2s1okt
vallás3sz
vá2m1®r
vándo2r1út
vará2zs1er
vará2zs1i
vará2zs3sz
váro2s1aty
váro2s1épít
váro2s3sz
vá2r1®r
vá2r1úr
va2s1ágy
va2s1aj
va2s1akar
va2s1ár
va3s2árn
va2s1ed
va2s1eg
va2s1érc
va2s1esz
va2s1olv
.va2s1ö
.vas3sz
va2s1utas
va2s1út
vasú2t1áll
vé2d1er®
vé2g1akar
vé2g1áll
vé2g1el
vé3g2eláthat
vé2g1eredmény
vé2g1érv
.végi2g1
.vé2g1í
.vé2g1ó
vé2g1össz
ve2gy1elem
ve2gy1ért
ve2gy1ipar
vé2n1assz
vendé2g1ágy
vendé2g1old
vé2n1emb
.vé2r1ad
.vé2r1al
vé2r1áldoz
vé2r1áram
vé2r1á2t1öml
.vé2r1eb
vé2r1edény
vé2r1ellát
vére2s3száj
vé2r1ont
.vé2r1ö
verse2ny1autó
verse2ny1ist
verse2ny1ú
verse2ny1u
ver2s1ír
ver2s3szak
vé2sz3síp
véte2l1ár
vezé2r1elv
vezé2r1eszme
vezé2r1evez
vezé2r1ezr
vezé2r1iga
vezé2r1®rn
via2sz3sárg
ví2g1oper
vilá2g1egy
vilá2g1égés
vilá2g1irod
vilá2g1ismer
vilá2g1ural
vilá2g1¶r
villamos3szék
villa2ny1áram
.villa2ny1e
villa2ny1ég®
villa2ny1®ra
villa2ny1oszlop
virá2g1ágy
virá2g1álv
virá2g1ár
virá2g1erd
viszon2t1elad
vissz1ér
vissz1eres
vité2z3ség
ví2z1áll
.ví2z1át
ví2z1ellátás
ví2z1elnyel®
ví2z1elvezet
ví2z1épít
ví2z1esés
ví2z1iszony
.ví2z3s
vona2t1érk
vona2t1ind
vörö2s1®r
wat2t1
zápo2r1es®
zá2r1óra
zászló2s1úr
z1k2raksz
zu2g1ír
zu2g1irász
zu2g1utca
.zu2g1ü
zsá2k1utca
zse2b1atlasz
.zsi2b1ár
zsili2p1®r
zsí2r1alkohol
zsí2r1ellát
zsoltá2r1ír
